Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Tourism
and Recreation Department from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($2,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
fund the interior and exterior updates, including but not limited to
building interpretive spaces and galleries, building, renovating,
signage, landscaping, and other associated work at the J.M Davis
Arms and Historical Museum.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 14291 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14291 TKR 01/13/26




















Req. No. 14291 Page 2